Illinois, session 104th, HB1923.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 52-3.206 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.206 new)7    Sec. 2-3.206. School ventilation.8    (a) As used in this Section: 9    "Active classroom" means any room currently being used for 10any duration of in-person instruction of 4 or more students at 11a time.12    "ASHRAE" means the American Society of Heating, 13Refrigerating and Air-Conditioning Engineers.14    "Certified assessor" means:15        (1) a certified technician; or16        (2) a person who is certified to perform ventilation 17    verification assessments of heating, ventilation, and air 18    conditioning systems through a certification body 19    accredited by the American National Standards Institute.20    "CADR" means clean air delivery rate.21    "Certified technician" means a person who is certified as 22a Testing, Adjusting, and Balancing Bureau Technician by the 23International Certification Board and accredited to comply   HB1923- 2 -LRB104 09447 LNS 19507 b1with ISO/IEC 17024, which is the conformity assessment 2regarding general requirements for bodies operating 3certification of persons, by the American National Standards 4Institute in Testing Adjusting and Balancing or another 5nationally recognized certifying body accredited to ISO/IEC 617024 in testing adjusting and balancing.7    "CFM" means cubic feet per minute.8    "DBA" means decibels.9    "HEPA" means High Efficiency Particulate Air. 10    "HVAC" means Heating, Ventilation, and Air Conditioning.11    "Mechanical engineer" means a professional engineer 12licensed as a mechanical engineer by the Department of 13Financial and Professional Regulation who has professional 14experience with heating, ventilation, and air conditioning 15systems.16    "PM2.5" means particulate matter at 2.5 microns or less.17    "PM10" means particulate matter at 10 microns or less.18    "PPM" means parts per million.19    "UV" means ultraviolet.20    "Skilled and trained construction workforce" means a 21workforce in which at least 40% of the workers are graduates of 22or registered in and attending an accredited apprenticeship 23program registered with the United States Department of Labor.24    (b) The State Board of Education shall require all school 25districts to supply all active classroom instructors, all 26school staff and administration, and district leadership with   HB1923- 3 -LRB104 09447 LNS 19507 b1an educational document, in a PDF and a physical format, 2explaining, at a minimum, the values of good indoor air 3quality, including peer-reviewed research demonstrating the 4effects of poor and good indoor air quality, an explanation of 5the airborne transmission of pathogens and other airborne 6substances, a basic explanation of air changes per hour and 7the relation to outdoor air and filtered air, and best 8practice recommendations for a portable air cleaner and an air 9quality monitor, including guidance on the theory, function, 10placement, and operation of the monitor. The document shall be 11developed with the assistance of a major independent and 12nonpartisan approved organization recognized as a subject 13matter expert in the field of air quality, such as a local 14ASHRAE chapter. This document shall be created and supplied to 15schools within 3 months after the effective date of this 16amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 17    (c) Subject to appropriation, the State Board shall 18require all school districts to ensure that all active 19classrooms that are not mechanically ventilated have at least 202 properly functioning windows, or one window in situations 21where only one is present, that can open and can safely stay 22open. School districts must be in compliance with this Section 23within 6 months after the effective date of this amendatory 24Act of the 104th General Assembly.25    (d) Subject to appropriation, the State Board shall 26require all school districts to ensure that all active   HB1923- 4 -LRB104 09447 LNS 19507 b1classrooms are equipped with an air quality monitor that:2        (1) is installed and operating within one month 3    following delivery;4        (2) remains in the active classroom until classroom is 5    no longer an active classroom;6        (3) is an air quality monitor that has been determined 7    by the State Board to be suitable, by the State Board 8    seeking out and obtaining a written statement noting that 9    the capabilities of the monitor in question are sufficient 10    to serve the purposes described in this Section, from a 11    major independent and nonpartisan organization recognized 12    as a subject matter expert in the field of air quality, 13    such as a local ASHRAE chapter. The written statement 14    shall minimally address suitability of: the selected 15    monitor's measurement technology, calibration 16    specifications, and manufacturer stated accuracies and 17    ranges;18        (4) measures, at a minimum, carbon dioxide and PM2.5. 19    Selected monitors are recommended to also measure carbon 20    monoxide, PM10, volatile organic compounds, temperature, 21    and humidity;22        (5) displays, at a minimum, carbon dioxide readings 23    through a display on the device or other means, such as on 24    a computer or cellular phone application;25        (6) is corded and does not rely solely on batteries 26    for power;  HB1923- 5 -LRB104 09447 LNS 19507 b1        (7) is to be located between 3 and 6 feet above the 2    floor and at least 5 feet away from doors, operable 3    windows, or human occupants; 4        (8) connects via a wired or wireless connection to 5    other applicable monitors so as to permit recording of 6    data which includes at least the maximum carbon dioxide 7    concentrations for a period of at least one year, as well 8    as remote access to current air quality readings through a 9    computer or cellular phone application; and10        (9) provides notification through a visual indicator 11    on the monitor, or other alert such as electronic mail, 12    text message or cellular phone application, when the 13    carbon dioxide levels in the classroom have exceeded a PPM 14    level recommended to the State Board in writing by a major 15    independent and nonpartisan organization recognized as a 16    subject matter expert in the field of air quality, such as 17    a local ASHRAE chapter.18    Each school shall record all incidents where the 19recommended PPM level was breached in a classroom and maintain 20those records for at least 5 years.21    Any supplied air quality monitor under this subsection may 22not be shared between active classrooms.23    If devices matching the criteria described in this 24subsection are unavailable, the State Board shall contact a 25major independent and nonpartisan organization recognized as a 26subject matter expert in the field of air quality, such as a   HB1923- 6 -LRB104 09447 LNS 19507 b1local ASHRAE chapter, and request assistance in determining 2suitable selection criteria for an air quality monitor that 3will sufficiently accomplish the goals of: providing teachers 4and staff with air quality information to facilitate managing 5indoor air quality; storing a sufficient type and duration of 6data to facilitate ventilation assessments; provide remote 7access to current air quality readings; and generally align 8with contemporary best practice recommendations.9    (e) Subject to appropriation, the State Board shall 10require all school districts to ensure that all active 11classrooms are equipped with a portable air cleaner that:12        (1) is installed and operating within one month 13    following delivery;14        (2) remains in the active classroom until classroom is 15    no longer an active classroom;16        (3) is a portable air cleaner the State Board has 17    determined to be suitable, by seeking out and obtaining a 18    written statement noting that the capabilities of the 19    portable air cleaner in question are sufficient to serve 20    the purposes described in this Section, from a major 21    independent and nonpartisan organization recognized as a 22    subject matter expert in the field of air quality, such as 23    a local ASHRAE chapter; 24        (4) utilizes a HEPA filter that captures 99.97% of 0.3 25    micron particles. A filter stated to be equal to or 26    superior to a HEPA may not be used;  HB1923- 7 -LRB104 09447 LNS 19507 b1        (5) utilizes or has the option of utilizing a 2    secondary filter for gaseous pollutants, such as activated 3    carbon;4        (6) only utilizes HEPA filtration, as opposed to 5    additional technologies such as ionization, chemical 6    processes, and UV. If such additional technologies are 7    present in the selected portable air cleaner they must be 8    able to be disabled;9        (7) Produces 500 or more CFM as measured by CADR or 10    similar metric of filtered airflow;11        (8) Produces 500 or more CFM of filtered airflow at 12    under 45 dBA of noise, according to manufacturer supplied 13    dBA test results measured at one meter in front of the 14    portable air cleaner;15        (9) is Underwriters Laboratories certified or 16    certified to Underwriters Laboratories standards;17        (10) has a manufacturer's warranty of at least one 18    year;19        (11) shall be continuously operated during room 20    occupancy on at least low speed;21        (12) shall be maintained according to manufacturer's 22    recommendation, written approval shall be obtained from 23    the manufacturer if deviation from standard 24    recommendations is being considered; and25        (13) shall be replaced within one month if it becomes 26    inoperable.  HB1923- 8 -LRB104 09447 LNS 19507 b1    If a single portable air cleaner on the market does not 2meet the parameters of this subsection, then 2 or more 3portable air cleaners per active classroom may be substituted 4if they produce a combined 500 or more CFM, as measured by CADR 5or similar metric, of filtered airflow at under 45 combined 6dBA of noise according to manufacturer supplied dBA test 7results measured at one meter in front of the portable air 8cleaner. 9    Any supplied portable air cleaner may not be shared 10between active classrooms. 11    (f) Subject to appropriation, the State Board shall 12require all school districts to supply each school with 5 13additional portable air cleaners and 5 additional air quality 14monitors that meet the requirements of subsections (d) and (e) 15to be used in school health offices, libraries, cafeterias, 16and other similar spaces. 17    (g) Subject to appropriation, the State Board shall 18require all school districts to undertake a ventilation 19verification assessment of all mechanical ventilation systems 20in the school district performed by a certified assessor or a 21mechanical engineer and shall be based on physical 22measurements made during the assessment. If an assessment is 23performed by a certified assessor, the assessment report shall 24be reviewed by a mechanical engineer. The ventilation 25verification assessment shall verify whether the existing 26mechanical ventilation system is operating in accordance with   HB1923- 9 -LRB104 09447 LNS 19507 b1design parameters and meets the requirements of any applicable 2building codes. The ventilation verification assessment for a 3heating, ventilation, and air conditioning system shall 4include:5        (1) testing for maximum filter efficiency;6        (2) measurements of outside air rate;7        (3) verification of operation of ventilation 8    components;9        (4) measurement of all air distribution inlets and 10    outlets;11        (5) verification of unit operation and that required 12    maintenance has been performed;13        (6) verification of control sequences; 14        (7) verification or installation of carbon dioxide 15    sensors; and16        (8) collection of field data for the installation of 17    mechanical ventilation if none exists.18    (h) The verification assessment report from the mechanical 19engineer shall include appropriate corrective actions needed 20for the mechanical ventilation system or the heating, 21ventilation, and air conditioning infrastructure, including 22installation of appropriate filters, installation of carbon 23dioxide sensors and additional maintenance, repairs, upgrades 24or replacement.25    (i) The school district shall have a ventilation 26verification assessment performed on all mechanical   HB1923- 10 -LRB104 09447 LNS 19507 b1ventilation systems in the school district at least every 5 2years. The ventilation verification assessment and the 3ventilation verification reports are public documents and 4shall be available to the public upon request.5    (j) Each school's first ventilation verification 6assessment shall occur between one and 6 months after the 7school's air quality monitors have been installed and data has 8started recording, and all measurements for this assessment, 9and all following, shall be made in the same conditions in 10which the building typically operates. The assessment plan 11shall be developed with the assistance and approval of a major 12independent and nonpartisan major organization recognized as a 13subject matter expert in the field of air quality, such as a 14local ASHRAE chapter, to ensure that the assessment results 15are representative of indoor air quality conditions 16experienced during normal occupancy.